Tennessee, session 114, SB2322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-7-203(a), is amended by deleting
the language "twenty-one (21) calendar days" and substituting "fourteen (14) calendar days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2322
012560
- 1 -